Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Public Assistance Program

205.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Secretary” means the secretary for health and family services or his authorized representative;

“Public assistance” means money grants, assistance in kind, or services to or for the benefit of needy aged, needy blind, needy permanently and totally disabled persons, needy children, or persons with whom a needy child lives or a family containing a combination of these categories, except that the term shall not be construed to permit the granting of financial aid where the purpose of such aid is to obtain an abortion. For purposes of this section and KRS 205.560, “abortion” means an act, procedure, device, or prescription administered or prescribed for a pregnant woman by any person, including the pregnant woman herself, producing premature expulsion of the fetus. Abortion does not include an induced premature birth intended to produce a live viable child;

“Needy child” means a child who has been deprived of parental support by reasons prescribed by regulations within the scope of Title IV of the Social Security Act, its amendments, and federal regulations and who does not have otherwise provided for him a subsistence compatible with decency and health;

“Parent,” in addition to biological or adoptive parent, shall include stepparent;

“Needy aged” means a person who has attained the age of sixty-five (65) and who is unable to provide for himself and who does not have otherwise provided for him a subsistence compatible with decency and health;

“Needy blind” means a person who has no vision or whose vision is so defective as to prevent the performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential and who is unable to provide for himself and who does not have otherwise provided for him a subsistence compatible with decency and health;

“Person with whom a needy child lives” means the individual prescribed by regulation, with whom such child is living in a place of residence maintained by such individual by himself or together with one (1) or more other persons;

“Needy permanently and totally disabled” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older and who has a permanent physical or mental impairment, disease, or loss that substantially precludes him from engaging in useful occupations within his competence and who is unable to provide for himself and who does not have otherwise provided for him a subsistence compatible with decency and health;

“Private institution” means any establishment or place other than a public institution operated or maintained by any individual, association, corporation, or other organization which provides a group living arrangement for four (4) or more individuals, who are cared for and maintained in residence for compensation or otherwise;

“Public institution” means any establishment or place which is the responsibility of and administered by the state or any political subdivision thereof providing a group living arrangement in which one (1) or more individuals are cared for and maintained in residence;

“Public medical institution” means any public institution the primary purpose of which is to furnish hospital care and medical treatment;

“Person determined to be potentially responsible” means any person who:

Is not aged, blind, disabled, incapacitated, or needed in the home:

Because of the illness or incapacity of a member of the family; or

Because of children in the home under the age of six (6); or

Volunteers for such determination;

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to deprive a woman of all appropriate medical care necessary to prevent her physical death;

“Adult day-care center” means any adult care facility which provides part-time care, day or night, but less than twenty-four (24) hours, to at least four (4) adults not related to the operator of the adult care facility by blood, marriage, or adoption.

History.
3766bb: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 110, §§ 1, 12; 1952, ch. 33, § 1; 1956, ch. 75, § 1; 1962, ch. 39, § 1; 1966, ch. 134, § 1; 1970, ch. 248, § 6; 1972, ch. 256, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, §§ 44, 107(21); 1974, ch. 180, § 1; 1978, ch. 140, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 315, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 422, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 100, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 181, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 51, effective June 20, 2005.

205.020.
Persons eligible for state assistance. [Repealed.]

205.030.
Amount of state assistance. [Repealed.]

205.040.
Duties of Department of Welfare. [Repealed.]

205.045.
Social security appropriations not to lapse at end of first fiscal year of biennium. [Renumbered.]

205.050.
Administration of oath and acknowledgment of documents. [Repealed.]

205.060.
Records to be confidential — Rules governing. [Repealed.]

205.065.
Confidential treatment of records concerning old age assistance, aid to dependent children and needy blind. [Repealed.]

205.070.
Right of appeal. [Repealed.]

205.080.
Assistance inalienable and exempt from execution. [Repealed.]

205.090.
County old age pensions. [Repealed.]

205.100.
Persons entitled to county pension — Amount. [Repealed.]

205.110.
Qualifications of beneficiaries. [Repealed.]

205.120.
Persons not entitled to county pension. [Repealed.]

205.130.
Death of pensioner — Reimbursement from his estate. [Repealed.]

205.140.
Application for pension — Modification of allowance — Reports. [Repealed.]

205.150.
Obtaining pension by fraud. [Repealed.]

205.160.
Administrative functions of commissioner of economic security — Personnel — Compensation and retirement benefits — Administrative costs. [Repealed.]

205.170.
Powers of secretary.

In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter the secretary or his duly authorized representative may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records considered necessary and relevant as evidence in connection with the administration of the cabinet. Such subpoena shall be served in the same manner as a subpoena issued out of a Circuit Court.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda or other records in response to such subpoena on the grounds that the evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty, or forfeiture. No person shall be prosecuted or subjected to any suit, penalty, or forfeiture on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or his agent or worker is compelled, after having claimed privilege against self-incrimination, to give evidence except that such witness so testifying shall not be exempt from punishment for perjury.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 110, § 3; 1952, ch. 33, § 2; 1972, ch. 256, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21), (29).

205.175.
Confidential treatment of information and records — Persons to whom furnished.

All letters, reports, communications, and other matters, written or oral, to the cabinet or any of its agents, representatives, or employees, or to any board or official functioning under this chapter which have been written, sent, or made in connection with the requirements and administration of the cabinet shall be absolutely privileged and shall not be the subject matter or basis for any suit for slander or libel in any court, but no person testifying before the secretary or his duly authorized representative shall be exempt from punishment for perjury.

Information received or transmitted shall not be published or be open for public inspection, including instances in which the agency determines reasonable cause to believe evidence of domestic violence or child abuse and the disclosure of the information could be harmful to the custodial parent or the child of the parent, except that necessary information and records may be furnished to:

Public employees in the performance of their duties in connection with the administration of the public assistance or child support enforcement program pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act;

All law enforcement agencies including county attorneys, Commonwealth’s attorneys, District and Circuit Judges and grand juries in discovering and prosecuting cases involving fraud;

Duly elected members of the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the Congress of the United States in connection with their duties as members of such legislative bodies, but such information shall be limited to cases of individual constituents of the legislator, who have requested information regarding their application or grant, as specified in the inquiry by such legislator;

Any interested party at a hearing before the secretary or his duly authorized representative to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of his case; provided, that any names or information obtained through access to such records shall not be used for any commercial or political purposes; and

Any bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or other financial institution to the extent necessary to ascertain or confirm information submitted by the applicant or recipient and used to make eligibility or benefit determinations.

Information regarding a public assistance applicant or recipient may also be released, in the discretion of the secretary or those he may designate, to such individuals or agencies as meet the requirements of regulations promulgated by the secretary and who are supplying or cooperating in securing services, employment, or training for the applicant or recipient of public assistance.

The unauthorized use by any employee of the cabinet of information obtained pursuant to KRS 205.835 is prohibited.

History.
Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 33, § 3; 1970, ch. 248, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21), (29); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 191, effective January 2, 1978; 1986, ch. 286, § 3; effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 17, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 255, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

205.177.
Information may be shared by state and local governmental agencies — Conditions.

Notwithstanding any existing state statute or regulation to the contrary, any pertinent information concerning individual clients, patients, or applicants in the possession of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department of Education, or any other state or local governmental agency may be shared with any authorized representative of any other state or local governmental agency of similar function if the agency has a direct, tangible, legitimate interest in the individual concerned or his or her immediate family.

Any state agency designated in subsection (1) of this section may share pertinent information concerning a client, patient, or applicant with any private or quasi-private agency when such agency has an agreement with that state agency assuring the confidentiality of all such information, and provided that the private or quasi-private agency has a direct, tangible, legitimate interest in the individual concerned or his or her immediate family.

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 269, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 45; 1998, ch. 426, § 182, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 52, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 241, effective June 26, 2007.

205.178.
Enrollment or benefit tracking agency to receive information on recipients of Medicaid and food stamp benefits — Memorandum of understanding with departments providing information — Independent vendors — Multistate cooperative — Review when information indicates change in circumstances affecting recipient’s eligibility — Waiver of federal requirements relating to food stamps — Rules and regulations — Report.

At a regularly scheduled interval, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall receive and review information from the Kentucky Lottery Corporation concerning individuals enrolled as recipients in the Medicaid program or the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including but not limited to changes in income or resources.

On at least a monthly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall receive and review information from the Vital Statistics Branch concerning individuals enrolled in the Medicaid program or the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility.

On at least a quarterly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall receive and review information from the Kentucky Office of Unemployment Insurance concerning individuals enrolled in the Medicaid program or the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including but not limited to changes in employment or wages.

On at least a quarterly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall receive and review information concerning individuals enrolled in the Medicaid program or the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including but not limited to potential changes in residency as identified by out-of-state electronic benefit transfer transactions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with any department, agency, or division for information detailed in this section.
(5) (a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with any department, agency, or division for information detailed in this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any department, agency, or division for information detailed in this section, including but not limited to the Kentucky Lottery Corporation, the Vital Statistics Branch, the Office of Unemployment Insurance, and the Department for Community Based Services, shall enter into any necessary memoranda of understanding with the enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program requesting an agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet may contract with one (1) or more independent vendors to provide additional data or information that may indicate a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility.

Each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet shall explore joining any multistate cooperative to identify individuals who are also enrolled in public assistance programs outside of this state.

If an enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the Medicaid program or the food stamps program of the cabinet receives information concerning an individual enrolled in the Medicaid program or the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, the enrollment or benefit tracking agency or other appropriate agency shall review the individual’s case.

The food stamps program of the cabinet shall not seek, apply for, accept, or renew any waiver of requirements established under 7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(o) unless there is an economic downturn resulting in an unemployment rate of ten percent (10%) or more or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services determines an increase in the unemployment rate in any particular county is severe enough to necessitate a waiver.

The cabinet shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for the purposes of carrying out this section.

Upon request, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall submit a report relating to the number of individuals discovered utilizing services inappropriately, the number of individuals who were removed from one (1) or more public assistance programs as a result of a review pursuant to this section, and the amount of public funds preserved in total and by public assistance program and aggregated by prior years.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 141, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 146, § 54, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 13, effective July 15, 2020.

205.179.
Annual review of sites where residents receive state supplemental benefits to determine registration status of boarding home.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall conduct an annual review of all addresses or locations at which four (4) or more persons reside who receive state supplementation of federal supplemental security income benefits to determine if the address or location is a boarding home that has not registered pursuant to KRS 216B.305. The results of the review shall be reported to the Department for Aging and Independent Living and action shall be taken to ensure the registration of all unregistered boarding homes that are identified.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 63, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 183, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 217, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 14, effective June 26, 2007.

205.180.
Destruction of records.

The secretary for health and family services may authorize the destruction of such original reports and records as have been properly recorded or summarized in the permanent records of the cabinet or are no longer considered necessary to the proper administration of the cabinet. Such destruction or disposition shall be made only by order of the secretary. Any money received from the disposition of such records shall be deposited to the credit of trust and agency accounts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 110, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 46; 1998, ch. 426, § 184, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 218, effective June 20, 2005.

205.190.
Advisory committees. [Repealed.]

205.200.
Eligibility for public assistance.

A needy aged person, a needy blind person, a needy child, a needy permanently and totally disabled person, or a person with whom a needy child lives shall be eligible to receive a public assistance grant only if he has made a proper application or an application has been made on his behalf in the manner and form prescribed by administrative regulation. No individual shall be eligible to receive public assistance under more than one (1) category of public assistance for the same period of time.

The secretary shall, by administrative regulations, prescribe the conditions of eligibility for public assistance in conformity with the public assistance titles of the Social Security Act, its amendments, and other federal acts and regulations. The secretary shall also promulgate administrative regulations to allow for between a forty percent (40%) and a forty-five percent (45%) ratable reduction in the method of calculating eligibility and benefits for public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act. In no instance shall grants to families with no income be less than the appropriate grant maximum used for public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act. As used in this section, “ratable reduction” means the percentage reduction applied to the deficit between the family’s countable income and the standard of need for the appropriate family size.

The secretary may by administrative regulation prescribe as a condition of eligibility that a needy child regularly attend school, and may further by administrative regulation prescribe the degree of relationship of the person or persons in whose home such needy child must reside.

The secretary may by administrative regulation prescribe conditions for bringing paternity proceedings or actions for support in cases of out of wedlock birth or nonsupport by a parent in the public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act program.

Public assistance shall not be payable to or in behalf of any individual who has taken any legal action in his own behalf or in the behalf of others with the intent and purpose of creating eligibility for the assistance.

The cabinet shall promptly notify the appropriate law enforcement officials of the furnishing of public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act in respect to a child who has been deserted or abandoned by a parent.

No person shall be eligible for public assistance payments if, after having been determined to be potentially responsible, and afforded notice and opportunity for hearing, he refuses without good cause:

To register for employment with the state employment service,

To accept suitable training, or

To accept suitable employment.

To the extent permitted by federal law, scholarships, grants, or other types of financial assistance for education shall not be considered as income for the purpose of determining eligibility for public assistance.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit brought against a manufacturer or distributor of “Agent Orange” for damages resulting from exposure to “Agent Orange” by a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who served in Vietnam shall not be considered as income for the purpose of determining eligibility or continuing eligibility for public assistance and shall not be subject to a lien or be available for repayment to the Commonwealth for public assistance received by the recipient.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Kentucky law, the following shall be disregarded for the purposes of determining an individual’s eligibility for a means-tested public assistance program, and the amount of assistance or benefits the individual is eligible to receive under the program:
(10) (a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of Kentucky law, the following shall be disregarded for the purposes of determining an individual’s eligibility for a means-tested public assistance program, and the amount of assistance or benefits the individual is eligible to receive under the program:

Any amount in an ABLE account;

Any contributions to an ABLE account; and

Any distribution from an ABLE account for qualified disability expenses.

For purposes of this subsection:

“ABLE account” means an account established within any state having a qualified ABLE program as provided in 26 U.S.C. sec. 529A, as amended;

“Kentucky law” includes:

All provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes:

Any contract to provide Medicaid managed care established pursuant to this chapter;

Any agreement to operate a Medicaid program established pursuant to this chapter; and

Any administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter; and

“Qualified disability expenses” means expenses described in 26 U.S.C. sec. 529A of a person who is the beneficiary of an ABLE account.

The secretary may prescribe by administrative regulation, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, standards of suitability for training and employment.

History.
Enact Acts 1950, ch. 110, § 6; 1952, ch. 33, § 4; 1956, ch. 75, § 2; 1962, ch. 38, § 1; 1966, ch. 134, §§ 2, 3; 1970, ch. 248, § 4; 1972, ch. 256, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21), (29); 1988, ch. 121, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2016 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

205.2001.
“Public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act standard of need” defined.

For purposes of eligibility for public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act, “public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act standard of need” means an amount no less than the poverty income level by size of family unit, as annually issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, minus the combined value of the state’s average Medicaid utilization for a given family size plus the value of United States food stamps for a given family size.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 121, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 100, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

205.2002.
Education or training or employment of adults in families with dependent children — Goals for cabinet — Sanctions for noncompliance — Report to General Assembly. [Repealed.]

205.2003.
Administrative regulations for work program for public assistance recipients.

The secretary shall by administrative regulations subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A develop a work program for recipients of public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act to provide for immediate employment or preparation for employment.

Self-sufficiency of participants shall be the primary goal of the work program. Participants shall bear the ultimate responsibility in pursuit of this goal.

In partnership with participants, the cabinet shall assess their strengths and needs and provide supportive services to assist in the pursuit of work and self-sufficiency.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 100, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

205.2005.
Opt-out of 21 U.S.C. sec. 862a(a).

Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. sec. 862a(d)(1), all individuals residing in Kentucky shall be exempt from the application of 21 U.S.C. sec. 862a(a).

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 427, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 182, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

205.201.
Duties of cabinet as to the aging and the minority elderly.

The duties of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be to:

Promote and aid in the establishment of local programs and services for the aging;

Conduct programs to educate the public as to problems of the aging;

Review existing state programs and services for the aging and to make recommendations to the Governor, to the appropriate department and agencies of the state, and to the legislature for improvements in and additions to such programs and services;

Assist and encourage governmental and private agencies to coordinate their efforts on behalf of the aging;

Conduct and encourage other organizations to conduct studies concerning the aging;

Establish, in selected areas and communities of the state, programs of services for the aging to demonstrate the value of such programs, and to encourage local agencies to continue the programs and to create new services where needed. Emphasis shall be given to services designed to foster continued participation of older people in family and community life and to lessen the need for institutional care;

Provide services designed to meet the needs of the minority elderly in programs administered by the cabinet;

The cabinet shall solicit and consider the input of individuals and organizations representing the concerns of the minority elderly population as relates to:

Programs and services needed by the minority elderly;

The extent to which existing programs do not meet the needs of the minority elderly;

The accessibility of existing programs to the minority elderly;

The availability and adequacy of information regarding existing services;

Health problems the minority elderly experience at a higher rate than the nonminority elderly population; and

Financial, social, and other barriers experienced by the minority elderly in obtaining services;

Conduct an outreach program that provides information to minority elderly Kentuckians about health and social problems experienced by minority elderly persons and available programs to address those problems; and

Cooperate with the federal government and with the governments of other states in programs relating to the aging.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 207, § 1; 1992, ch. 246, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 186, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 219, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 31, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 36, § 14, effective July 15, 2020.

205.202.
Acceptance and disposition of gifts and grants.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be empowered to accept and expend gifts and grants from any source. Such moneys shall go into a trust and agency fund to be administered by the cabinet in furtherance of the purposes of the provisions of KRS 205.201 to 205.204.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 207, § 2; 1998, ch. 426, § 187, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 220, effective June 20, 2005.

205.203.
Authorization to provide in-home services to the aging — Collection of fees.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may provide, within budgetary limitations, for in-home services to the aging to include, but not necessarily limited to: homemaker services; home-help therapy services; day-care services; home-delivered meal services; transportation services; foster care services; and health services.

The cabinet is authorized to collect fees for services rendered pursuant to this section in accordance with a fee schedule adopted by the secretary for health and family services. The fee schedule shall take into consideration the ability of the patient or client to pay for such services. Fees shall not be collected from any person who is “needy aged” as defined by KRS 205.010.

The secretary may utilize and promote available or potential community resources for the delivery of services to the aging and shall, when he deems appropriate, contract for services with local, community, private agencies, and individuals, including relatives of patients and clients, when such services would not otherwise be available without cost.

The services to the aging authorized under this section are in addition and supplementary to any services to which the aging may be entitled under any other federal, state, or local governmental law, regulation, or program.

The services to the aging authorized under this section shall be designed to meet the needs of the minority elderly as identified by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services pursuant to KRS 205.201.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 207, § 3; 1992, ch. 246, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 188, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 221, effective June 20, 2005.

205.204.
Cabinet to administer Older Americans Act — Regulatory authority.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, unless otherwise directed by an executive order of the Governor, is designated the agency of this state for the purpose of administering the Older Americans Act of 1965, Pub. L. 89-73, including all amendments thereto. In administering programs and allocating funds under the Older Americans Act, the cabinet shall design programs and allocate funds to meet the needs of the minority elderly as identified by the cabinet pursuant to KRS 205.201.

The secretary for health and family services may promulgate such administrative regulations as are necessary to comply with any requirement imposed or required by federal law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 207, § 4; 1988, ch. 280, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 246, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 189, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 222, effective June 20, 2005.

205.210.
Amount of assistance — Proration in case of deficiency — Resources defined.

The amount of public assistance to be granted shall be determined with due regard to the needs and resources of the individual and family as prescribed by regulation, provided, that if available funds during a budgetary period are insufficient to meet the full needs of the recipients in all or any of the categories of public assistance, the funds available shall be reasonably prorated to recipients in such categories according to pending and anticipated applications during such budgetary period.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, resources in any given case shall be deemed to include among other things:

The income and any property belonging to any applicant or recipient; except the exemptions of the kind and the amount of income prescribed by regulations within the scope of the public assistance titles of the Social Security Act, its amendments and other federal acts and regulations;

The income and any property of the spouse living with any needy aged, needy blind or needy permanently and totally disabled person; and

Such income and resources as may be available to applicants or recipients from persons legally liable for their support.

The value of any property voluntarily transferred by any applicant or recipient or the spouse living with any applicant or recipient for the purpose of establishing eligibility for public assistance shall be deemed a resource of such applicant or recipient under this section.

The price brought on the sale of property at a public auction conducted by a licensed auctioneer shall be deemed to be the fair market value of that property.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 110, § 7; 1952, ch. 33, § 5; 1962, ch. 34, § 1; 1966, ch. 134, § 4; 1970, ch. 248, § 5; 1972, ch. 256, § 6; 2016 ch. 103, § 18, effective July 15, 2016.

205.211.
Secretary to correct any underpayment or overpayment of public assistance benefits.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the secretary may, in accordance with the regulations he may prescribe and to the extent permitted by federal law, take all necessary steps to correct any underpayment or overpayment of public assistance benefits under this chapter.

Recovery of overpayments by the secretary may be accomplished through repayment, reduction of future public assistance benefits, or by civil action in the Circuit or District Court depending upon the jurisdictional amount involved.

No reduction in future benefits or civil action shall be instituted except after notice and an opportunity for a fair hearing have been given and the administrative and judicial remedies provided by this chapter have been either exhausted or abandoned.

For purposes of this section, overpayment shall include payments made to or in behalf of an eligible person in excess of the amount of public assistance benefits to which they are entitled as defined by regulation, payments made to ineligible persons and payments made to persons pending a fair hearing decision or court decision.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit criminal prosecution for fraud under any other statute.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 149, § 1, effective March 26, 1982.

205.213.
Technical amendment to material that has been incorporated by reference in administrative regulation governing Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may amend material that had been previously incorporated by reference in an administrative regulation governing the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, formerly known as the federal food stamp program, through technical amendment if the amendment is prescribed by the United States Department of Agriculture.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 112, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

205.215.
Short-term assistance to families with children. [Repealed.]

205.217.
Long-term care case management demonstration. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 482, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 246, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 190, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 223, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

205.220.
Payments, to whom made — Accounting — Exemption from assignment, levy or execution.

Payments of public assistance grants for eligible individuals shall be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by regulation to:

The needy aged or needy blind or needy permanently and totally disabled person or recipient; or

The parent or relative with whom a needy child lives; or

The parent or legal guardian of a blind minor; or

The legal guardian of (a) or (b) above; or

Such other persons on behalf of an eligible person as may be prescribed by regulation; or

Committees appointed by the court and approved for payment purposes by the secretary according to prescribed regulations.

Any person who is receiving and disbursing public assistance grants on behalf of another individual eligible under this chapter shall upon request make an accounting of such funds to the cabinet in accordance with regulations. If a public assistance grant made on behalf of a needy individual is not used for the benefit of such individual, such payment shall be suspended pending reasonable assurance that future grants will benefit the individual on whose behalf such payments are made.

Public assistance shall not be assignable and shall be exempt from levy or execution. Furthermore, no assignment, pledge or encumbrance of any right to benefits due or payable under this chapter shall be valid. Public assistance benefits, as long as they are not mingled with other funds of the recipient, shall be exempt from any remedy for the collection of all debts, liens and encumbrances. No waiver of any exemption provided for in this subsection shall be valid.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 110, § 8; 1956, ch. 75, § 3; 1966, ch. 134, § 5; 1972, ch. 256, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21), (29); 1980, ch. 188, § 193, effective July 15, 1980.

205.222.
Assistance with unemployed male parent. [Repealed.]

205.223.
Conditions for applying KRS 205.222. [Repealed.]

205.225.
Misrepresentation of fact to obtain assistance — Action of secretary. [Repealed.]

205.227.
Action by secretary against persons legally liable for support.

The secretary or his authorized representative may initiate any action under the laws of this state against a parent or other person legally liable for support who has failed to provide support for the person to whom an obligation of support is owed and who is receiving public assistance benefits under this chapter.

The secretary or his authorized representative may institute an action in Circuit Court against a parent or other person legally liable for support who has failed to provide support for the person to whom an obligation of support is owed, for reimbursement of payments made by the cabinet under this chapter for the benefit of the person to whom an obligation of support is owed.

This in no way limits the cabinet’s authority to commence an action under the provisions of KRS Chapter 406 or 407.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 256, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21).

205.230.
Appeals. [Repealed.]